Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2017, out of the General
Fund, the amount of  $50,000,000 for the purposes for which the Emergency Board lawfully
may allocate funds.
SECTION 2. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $100,000,000, to be allocated to state agencies  for state employee com-
pensation changes for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2018, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 3. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, to be allocated  to state agencies for compensation changes
driven by collective bargaining for workers who are not state employees.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2018, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there are appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) Bradshaw Drop
Irrigation Canal project ............ $ 1,895,000
(2) Medford Holly Theatre
restoration ................................ $ 1,000,000
(3) Harry and David
Baseball Park ............................ $ 750,000
(4) Vietnam Wall Replica
project in Medford .................... $ 250,000
(5) Cities of Turner, Aumsville
and Salem flood mitigation ....... $ 40,000
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 1
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services by section 1 (4), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5002), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017,  is in-
creased by $150,000 for the Oregon Historical Society.
SECTION 6.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 4,  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5002),
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  from
lottery moneys  allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to
the Oregon Department of Administrative Services is increased by $180,000 for distribution
for county fairs.
SECTION 7.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill  5010), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for the Fish
Division, is increased by $650,000 for the Western Oregon Stream Restoration Program.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General  Fund appropriation made to
the State Department of Fish and  Wildlife by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017
(Enrolled House Bill 5010), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for the Fish Division,  is
increased by $250,000 to implement the Integrated Water Resources Strategy.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the State Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (2),  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017
(Enrolled House Bill  5010), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for the Wildlife Division,
is increased by $425,000 for sage grouse conservation activities.
SECTION 8. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (11), chapter  ___,
Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5524), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for the
Agricultural Experiment Station and the branch extension stations  of Oregon State Univer-
sity, is increased by $260,000 for potato research at  the Hermiston Agricultural Research and
Extension Center.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General  Fund appropriation made to
the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (11), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5524), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for the Agricultural
Experiment Station and the branch extension stations of Oregon  State University, is in-
creased by $120,000 for a position at the North Willamette Research and Extension Center.
SECTION 9.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission for use by Oregon  Institute of
Technology, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount
of $500,000 for the operations of the Renewable Energy Center.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Legislative Administration Committee by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2017 (Enrolled House  Bill 5017), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, is increased by
$5,145,277 for security enhancements for the Oregon State Capitol.
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Water  Resources Department by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5542), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, is increased by $333,677
for the payment of personal services costs associated with the establishment  of assistant
watermaster and administrative support positions in Umatilla County.
SECTION 12.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5542), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and including federal
funds received under cooperative agreements with or contracts  from the Bureau of Recla-
mation of the United States Department of the  Interior, the United States Army Corps of
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 2
Engineers, the  United States Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Administration and
the National Fish and Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds not
described in section 3,  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5542), collected
or received by the Water Resources Department, for field services is decreased by $333,677.
NOTE: Section 13 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 14. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  5 (2), chapter 761, Oregon Laws 2015, for the biennium ending June 30,
2017, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimbursement  from the
United States  Department of Transportation, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds
not described in section  5, chapter 761, Oregon Laws 2015, collected or received by the De-
partment of Transportation  is increased by $10,000,000 for maintenance and emergency relief
programs for costs associated with winter storms.
SECTION 15. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  5 (4), chapter 761, Oregon Laws 2015, for the biennium ending June 30,
2017, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimbursement  from the
United States  Department of Transportation, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds
not described in section  5, chapter 761, Oregon Laws 2015, collected or received by the De-
partment of Transportation is increased by $10,000,000 for the bridge program  for increased
project payout.
SECTION 16. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  5 (5), chapter 761, Oregon Laws 2015, for the biennium ending June 30,
2017, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts  and federal funds received as reimbursement from the
United States Department of Transportation, but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds
not described in section 5, chapter 761, Oregon Laws 2015, collected or received  by the De-
partment of Transportation is increased by $8,000,000 for  the operations program for in-
creased project payout.
SECTION 17. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  5 (6), chapter 761, Oregon Laws 2015, for the biennium ending June 30,
2017, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimbursement  from the
United States  Department of Transportation, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds
not described in section  5, chapter 761, Oregon Laws 2015, collected or received by the De-
partment of Transportation is increased by $15,000,000 for the modernization program for
increased project payout.
SECTION 18.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  5 (7), chapter 761, Oregon Laws 2015, for the biennium ending June 30,
2017, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts  and federal funds received as reimbursement from the
United States Department of Transportation, but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds
not described in section 5, chapter 761, Oregon Laws 2015, collected or received  by the De-
partment of Transportation is increased  by $2,500,000 for special programs for implementa-
tion of an ADA-related settlement agreement.
SECTION 19. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  6 (4), chapter 761, Oregon Laws 2015, for the biennium ending June 30,
2017, as the maximum limit  for payment of expenses from federal funds other than those
described in section  5, chapter 761, Oregon Laws 2015, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Transportation is  increased by $8,100,000 for public transit to complete commitments
carried over from the 2013-15 biennium.
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 3
SECTION 20. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the limitation on expenditures
established by section 4 (15), chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5540), for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  from
fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received
as reimbursement from the United States Department of Transportation, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and federal funds  not described in section 4, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (En-
rolled Senate Bill 5540), collected or received by the  Department of Transportation is
decreased by $406,813 for central services.
SECTION 21.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the limitation on expenditures
established by section 4 (11), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017  (Enrolled Senate Bill 5540), for
the biennium  beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from
fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received
as reimbursement  from the United States Department of Transportation, but excluding lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 4, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2017 (En-
rolled Senate Bill 5540), collected  or received by the Department of Transportation is
increased by $30,433,693 for transportation  program development for the Connect Oregon
program.
SECTION 22.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
established for the Land Use Board of Appeals by section 1,  chapter 536, Oregon Laws 2017
(Enrolled Senate Bill  5528), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, is increased by $11,650
for position actions.
NOTE: Section 23 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 24. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2,  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5012),
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenditures
for operations from fees, moneys or other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts and
federal funds from  the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for
contract services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described  in section 2,
chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5012), collected or received by  the
Housing and Community Services Department, is increased by $1,090,000 for the cost of is-
suance of bonds for affordable housing through the Local Innovation and  Fast Track housing
program.
SECTION 25.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Housing and Community Services  Department by section 1, chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5012), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2017, is increased
by $141,218 for payment of expenses  related to the development of affordable housing for low
income households funded with proceeds from bonds issued under the authority of Article
XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution through the  Local Innovation and Fast Track Housing
Program.
SECTION 26. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2,  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5012),
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  for
operations from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and fed-
eral funds from the United  States Department of Housing and Urban Development for con-
tract services, but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds not described in section 2,
chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5012), collected or received by  the
Housing and Community Services Department, is  increased by $25,395,235 for preservation
of existing affordable housing and cost of bond issuance.
SECTION 27. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Bureau of Labor and Industries, by section 1, chapter 509, Oregon  Laws 2017
(Enrolled House Bill 5016), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, is increased by $413,787
for investigation and enforcement provisions and employer education activities  related to
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 4
employer work schedule requirements under chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled  Senate
Bill 828).
NOTE: Section 28 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 29. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill
5039), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys  or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and the Oregon War
Veterans’ Bond Sinking Account, but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or
received by the Department  of Veterans’ Affairs is increased by $310,000 for costs of issuance
of general obligation bonds.
SECTION 30. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State Library by section 1, chapter 510, Oregon Laws  2017 (Enrolled House Bill
5018), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, is  increased by $197,488 for the Ready to Read
grant program.
SECTION 31. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission for use by Oregon  State Univer-
sity, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017,  out of the General Fund, the amount of $570,000
for the Molluscan Broodstock Program at the  Hatfield Marine Science Center in conjunction
with the Whiskey Creek Shellfish Hatchery.
SECTION 32. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission for use by Oregon  State Univer-
sity, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the  General Fund, the amount of
$280,000, which may be expended for  monitoring the effects of ocean acidification and con-
ducting ocean acidification research at the Whiskey Creek Shellfish Hatchery.
SECTION 33. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$16,573,792 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and reimbursements from federal service agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds not described in this  section, collected or received by the Department of Justice, for
the child support enforcement  automated system in the child support enforcement auto-
mated program.
SECTION 34.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by  section 1 (7), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled
House Bill 5015), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017,  is increased by $3,391,920 for capital
debt service and related costs for outstanding general obligation bonds  sold pursuant to Ar-
ticle XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution for the child  support enforcement automated system
in the debt service and related costs program.
SECTION 35. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$317,367 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses for  the costs of issuance of general obligation bonds sold pursuant to
Article XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including
Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements from federal service agreements, but excluding
lottery funds and federal funds not described in this section, collected or received  by the
Department of Justice for the capital debt service and related  costs program for the child
support enforcement automated system in the debt service and related costs program.
SECTION 36.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$32,136,210 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses for  the child support enforcement automated system in the child sup-
port enforcement automated program from federal  funds, other than those described in
section 33 of this 2017 Act, collected or received by the Department of Justice.
SECTION 37. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 5
5015), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of  Justice, is increased by
$6,916,041 for juvenile dependency representation in the Civil Enforcement program.
SECTION 38. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill
5015), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of  Justice, is increased by
$123,932 for the Civil Enforcement program for expenses related  to chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 243).
NOTE: Section 39 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 40. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Revenue, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,060,000 for the core system replacement project.
SECTION 41. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$8,383,109 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses for the core system replacement program from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements from federal service agree-
ments, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not described in this section, collected
or received by the Department of Revenue.
SECTION 42. In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, the General Fund
appropriation made to the Department of Revenue by section  1 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2017 (Enrolled Senate  Bill 5535), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, is increased by
$796,311 for capital debt  service and related costs for outstanding general obligation bonds
sold pursuant to  Article XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution for the core system replacement
program.
SECTION 43. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $73,056
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses for the costs of issuance of general obligation  bonds sold pursuant to Article
XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscella-
neous Receipts and reimbursements from federal service agreements,  but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described in this section, collected or received by the Department
of Revenue for the capital debt service  and related costs program for the core system re-
placement program.
SECTION 44.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5534), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Public Employees Retirement System,
is increased by $209,443 for the Financial and Administrative Services Division.
SECTION 45. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Education by section 1, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2017 (Enrolled
Senate Bill 5517), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for the State  School Fund, is de-
creased by $30,372,945.
SECTION 46. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2, chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5517), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Economic Development
Fund to the Department of Education for the State School Fund is increased by $12,465,745.
SECTION 47. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 6
5517), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
by the Department of Education from fees, moneys or other revenues,  including Miscella-
neous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,  collected or received by the
Department of Education for the State School Fund, is increased by $17,907,200.
NOTE: Section 48 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 49. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 6 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2017, (Enrolled Senate Bill
5524), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds, federal funds and funds described in sections 9 and 10, chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2017
(Enrolled Senate  Bill 5524), collected or received by the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission, is increased by $6,831,534  for the costs of issuing bonds on behalf of community
colleges and public universities.
SECTION 50. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $1,200,000 for a grant to Eastern Oregon
University for the information technology equipment facility project.
SECTION 51. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $490,000 for a grant to Oregon State Uni-
versity for the renovation of the Graduate and Research Center at the Cascades Campus.
SECTION 52. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $480,517 for debt service on general  obligation bonds issued
under Article XI-Q of  the Oregon Constitution for replacement and repair of roofs, and for
Americans with Disabilities Act compliance projects at the Oregon School for the Deaf.
SECTION 53. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3  (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017, (Enrolled Senate Bill
5516), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the  maximum limit for payment of ex-
penses, other than expenses  described in sections 6 and 10, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5516), from fees, moneys or other revenues,  including Miscellaneous
Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Education, is increased by $1,052,442 for the costs of issuing Article XI-P bonds  and
Article XI-Q bonds.
SECTION 54. (1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill
5013), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts and including re-
imbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds
not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5013), collected
or received by the Judicial Department, is decreased by $16,707,354 for operations.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of $17,942,354 is es-
tablished for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of ex-
penses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including
reimbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds not  described in this subsection, collected or received by the Judicial Department for
the State Court Technology Fund.
(3) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of $195,200,000 is
established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum  limit for payment of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and includ-
ing reimbursements from federal service agreements, but excluding lottery  funds and federal
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 7
funds not  described in this subsection, collected or received by the Judicial Department for
the Oregon Courthouse Capital Construction and Improvement Fund.
(4) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to  the
Judicial Department, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2017, out of the General Fund, the
amount of $1,200,000 for a grant to Clackamas County for  county courthouse replacement
planning.
SECTION 55. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appro-
priation made to the Oregon Business Development Department by  section 1 (3), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for debt
service, is increased by $2,836,985.
(2) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section 3 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House  Bill 5025), for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses for business,
innovation and trade  from lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the  Oregon Business Development Department, is increased by
$500,000 for support of the Regional Accelerator Innovation Network.
(3) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House  Bill 5025), for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses for the
Oregon Infrastructure Finance Authority from fees, moneys  or other revenues, including
Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received
by the Oregon Business Development Department, is increased by $22,563,295.
(4) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $120,000,000 is
established for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses for  the seismic rehabilitation grant program from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or
received by the Oregon Business Development Department.
(5) Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the amount of $3,000,000 is es-
tablished for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of ex-
penses for the Oregon Manufacturing Innovation  Center from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Department.
(6) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section 2 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House  Bill 5025), for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses for the Arts
and Cultural Trust  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business
Development Department, is increased by $2,571,976.
(7) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section 2 (1), chapter __, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill  5025), for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses for business,
innovation and trade from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business
Development Department, is increased by  $3,450,979, for improving access to the Oregon
Manufacturing Innovation Center.
(8) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to  the
Oregon Business Development  Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $1,650,000  for the Oregon Arts Commission for legislatively
identified grants to cultural institutions.
(9) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $1 is established
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  for
regional solutions from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 8
but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business
Development Department.
(10) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to  the
Oregon Business Development  Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000 for a grant for the Crescent Sanitary District
Sewer System.
NOTE:
 Section 56 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 57. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Commission on Judicial Fitness and Disability by section 1 (2), chapter 93,
Oregon Laws 2015,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2017, for extraordinary expenses, is in-
creased by $35,000.
SECTION 58. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of  Human Services by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5526), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, for child welfare, self-
sufficiency and vocational rehabilitation services, is increased  by $1,300,000 for the Hunger
Response Fund.
SECTION 59. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health  Authority by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (En-
rolled House Bill 5026), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for programs, is increased
by $200,000 for the Senior Farm Direct Nutrition Program.
SECTION 60. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health  Authority by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (En-
rolled House Bill 5026), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for programs, is increased
by $1,000,000 for the Women, Infants and Children Farm Direct Nutrition Program.
NOTE: Section 61 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 62. (1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill
5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
for programs from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco
tax receipts, recreational marijuana tax receipts, provider taxes, Medicare  receipts and fed-
eral funds for indirect cost recovery, Supplemental Security Income recoveries,  Women, In-
fants and Children Program  food rebates, the Coordinated School Health Program, the
Edward Byrne Memorial State and Local Law Enforcement Assistance Grant Program  and
emergency preparedness and response services, but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds
not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5026), collected
or received by the Oregon Health Authority, is increased by $63,250,000.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House
Bill 5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for programs, is decreased by $63,250,000.
SECTION 63.
(1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill
5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
for programs from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco
tax receipts, recreational marijuana tax receipts, provider taxes, Medicare  receipts and fed-
eral funds for indirect cost recovery, Supplemental Security Income recoveries,  Women, In-
fants and Children Program  food rebates, the Coordinated School Health Program, the
Edward Byrne Memorial State and Local Law Enforcement Assistance Grant Program  and
emergency preparedness and response services, but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds
not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5026), collected
or received by the Oregon Health Authority, is increased by $375,000.
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 9
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House
Bill 5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for programs, is decreased by $375,000.
SECTION 64. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2017 (En-
rolled House Bill 5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017,  for programs, is increased
by $10,000,000 for hepatitis C treatment costs.
SECTION 65. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2017 (En-
rolled House  Bill 5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for programs, is decreased
by $401,413 for the Oregon State Hospital.
SECTION 66. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2017 (En-
rolled House Bill 5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017,  for programs, is increased
by $3,226,060 for rural provider incentive programs.
SECTION 67. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill
5031), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department  of State Police, is increased
by $2,521,711 for Capitol Mall security.
SECTION 68. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3,  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5034),
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  from
federal funds collected or received by the Department of Public Safety Standards and Train-
ing, is increased by $469,566 for fire training props and equipment.
SECTION 69.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017
(Enrolled House Bill 5004), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for operations and health
services, is increased by $708,788 for prison transport vehicles.
SECTION 70. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Youth  Authority by section 1 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (En-
rolled House Bill 5042), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for capital  improvements, is
increased by $771,000 for electronic security improvements.
SECTION 71. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Military Department,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of
the General Fund,  the amount of $1,000,000 for construction or repair of the Oregon Military
Museum.
SECTION 72. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill
5004), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
for central administration and administrative services from fees, moneys  or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or
received by the Department of Corrections, is increased by $721,466 for the cost of  bond is-
suance.
SECTION 73. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017
(Enrolled House Bill 5004),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for debt service, is in-
creased by $1,926,252.
SECTION 74. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2,  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5042),
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  from
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 10
fees, moneys or other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Youth Authority, is  increased
by $676,086 for the cost of bond issuance.
SECTION 75. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Youth  Authority by section 1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (En-
rolled House Bill 5042), for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2017, for debt service, is increased
by $1,695,236.
SECTION 76. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5532), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements
from federal service agreements, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not described
in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5532), collected or  received
by the Oregon Military Department, is increased by $448,244 for the cost of bond issuance.
SECTION 77. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Military Department by section 1 (5),  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5532),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for debt service, is de-
creased by $378,344.
SECTION 78. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled
Senate Bill 5535), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, is increased by $276,906 for ad-
ministration.
SECTION 79.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5535), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements
from federal service agreements, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not described
in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5535), collected or  received
by the Department of Revenue, is increased by $24,079 for administration.
SECTION 80. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5535), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other  revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements
from federal service agreements, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not described
in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5535), collected or  received
by the Department of Revenue, is decreased by $187,277 for the Property Tax Division.
SECTION 81. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5535), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements
from federal service agreements, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not described
in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5535), collected or  received
by the Department of Revenue, is increased by $244,058 for the Marijuana Division.
SECTION 82. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by  section 1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled
House Bill 5015), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, is increased by $175,000 for  the
Crime Victims’ Services Division for the Oregon Crime Victims Law Center.
SECTION 83. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (8), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5540), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds
received as reimbursement  from the United States Department of Transportation, but ex-
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 11
cluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 4, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws
2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5540), collected or received by the Department of Transportation,
is increased by $2,050,587 for City of Portland SW Capitol Highway safety improvements.
SECTION 84.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (12), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled  Senate Bill
5540), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds
received as reimbursement  from the United States Department of Transportation, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 4, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws
2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5540), collected or received by the Department of Transportation,
is increased by $5,119,541 for the Lane Transit District.
SECTION 85.
In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) Mid-Columbia Health
Foundation for hospital
modernization and expansion
project....................................... $ 200,000
(2) City of John Day for
fiber project .............................. $ 1,836,000
(3) City of John Day for
9-1-1 systems ............................. $ 420,000
(4) Greater Portland YWCA
for the Family Preservation
Project ...................................... $ 400,000
(5) World of Speed .......................... $ 50,000
(6) YMCA Youth and Government . $ 50,000
(7) Bag and Baggage Productions
Cultural Innovation Project ...... $ 50,000
SECTION 86.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from lottery bond proceeds and other revenues, including Miscellaneous Re-
ceipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, for the following purposes:
(1) Cascade AIDS Project
for construction of the
Prism Health clinic ................... $ 1,042,655
(2) City of Spray for a
public safety and emergency
services center .......................... $ 764,128
(3) Eugene Civic Alliance for
Civic Park sports and recreation
complex..................................... $ 6,125,396
(4) Family Nurturing Center
Rogue Valley Children’s
Relief Nursery ........................... $ 2,050,587
(5) Gresham Redevelopment
Commission for the Rockwood
Innovation Center ..................... $ 2,050,587
(6) City of Independence for
the Independence Landing
revitalization project................. $ 1,041,303
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 12
(7) Klamath County for the
Klamath Youth Inspiration
Program .................................... $ 1,041,303
(8) The Dalles Civic Auditorium
Historic Preservation
Committee for The Dalles
Civic Auditorium....................... $ 784,922
(9) City of Woodburn for the
Woodburn Community Center .. $ 1,041,303
(10) YMCA of Marion and Polk
Counties for a new facility ....... $ 12,235,018
SECTION 87.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (13),  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill
5002), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal  funds
received from  charges, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section
2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled  House Bill 5002), collected or received by the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services, is increased by $1,080,818 for  Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services debt service.
SECTION 88. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled  House Bill
5002), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds
received from  charges, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section
2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill  5002), collected or received by the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services, is increased  by $214,000 for the payment of
bond issuance costs associated with bonds issued under  Article XI-Q of the Oregon Consti-
tution.
SECTION 89. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State Department of Agriculture for market access  by section 1 (4), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5502), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017,  is de-
creased by $250,000.
SECTION 90. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$215,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses for  bond issuance costs associated with bonds issued under Article XI-Q
of the Oregon  Constitution from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous
Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the State
Department of Fish and Wildlife.
SECTION 91. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Department of Environmental Quality for air quality by section 1 (1), chapter
___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5518), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2017,
is increased by $500,000 for an inventory of nonroad diesel engines.
SECTION 92. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4, chapter ___ (Enrolled House Bill 5012) for  the biennium
beginning July 1 2017, as  the maximum payment of expenses from federal funds other than
those described in sections 2 and 6, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5012),
collected or  received by the Housing and Community Services Department, is decreased by
$7,107,780.
SECTION 93. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Housing and Community Services  Department by section 5, chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5012), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2017, is increased
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 13
by $3,407,395 for debt service associated with bonds issued pursuant to Article  XI-Q of the
Oregon Constitution for the Local Innovation and Fast Track Housing Program.
SECTION 94. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2,  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5012),
for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses for
operations from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and fed-
eral funds from the United States Department of Housing and  Urban Development for con-
tract services, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2,
chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5012), collected or received by the
Housing and  Community Services Department, is increased by $155,660 for payment of ex-
penses related to the development of  affordable housing for low income households funded
with proceeds issued  pursuant to Article XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution for the Local In-
novation and Fast Track Housing Program.
SECTION 95. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Housing and Community Services  Department by section 1, chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5012),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, is increased
by $1,300,000 for the Oregon Foreclosure Avoidance program.
SECTION 96. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of State Police by section 1 (1), chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2017
(Enrolled House Bill 5031), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for  patrol services,
criminal investigations and gaming  enforcement, is increased by $6,230,000 for 20 sworn pa-
trol and drug enforcement positions.
SECTION 97. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (6),  chapter __, Oregon
Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5524), for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2017, for the Oregon
Promise Grants, is increased by $5,300,000.
SECTION 98. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$100,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and proceeds of bonds  issued pursuant to Article XI-P of the Oregon Constitution, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Education
for matching grants made to  school districts for construction or improvement to school fa-
cilities through the Oregon School Capital Improvement Matching program.
SECTION 99.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (1),  chapter __, Oregon
Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5524), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2017, for operations,
is increased by $350,000 for a  grant to the College Possible organization to encourage and
assist low income students to attend a post-secondary institution.
NOTE: Sections 100 and 101 were deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections  were not re-
numbered.
SECTION 102. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill
5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts,
recreational marijuana tax receipts, provider taxes, Medicare receipts and federal funds  for
indirect cost recovery, Supplemental Security Income recoveries, Women, Infants and Chil-
dren Program food rebates, the Coordinated School Health Program, the  Edward Byrne Me-
morial State and Local Law Enforcement Assistance Grant  Program and emergency
preparedness and response services, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not de-
scribed in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5026), collected  or
received by the Oregon Health  Authority, for programs, is increased by $196,111 for the
Prescription Drug Monitoring Program.
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 14
SECTION 103. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5526), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for  central services
and state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $1,967,384 for the ONE In-
tegrated Eligibility and Medicaid Eligibility project.
SECTION 104.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Human Services, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2017, out
of the  General Fund, the amount of $9,492,916, which may be expended for capital debt ser-
vice and related costs for outstanding general obligation bonds sold pursuant to Article XI-Q
of the Oregon Constitution for the ONE Integrated Eligibility and Medicaid Eligibility project.
SECTION 105. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$522,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses for  the costs of issuance of general obligation bonds sold pursuant to
Article XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including
Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements from federal service agreements, but excluding
lottery funds and federal funds not described in this section, collected or received  by the
Department Human Services, for the  capital debt service and related costs for the ONE In-
tegrated Eligibility and Medicaid Eligibility project.
SECTION 106.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5526), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medi-
care receipts and including federal funds  for indirect cost recovery, Social Security Supple-
mental Security Income recoveries and the Child  Care and Development Fund, but excluding
lottery funds and federal funds not described  in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5526), collected or received by the Department of Human  Services, for
central services and state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by  $45,000,000
for the ONE Integrated Eligibility and Medicaid Eligibility project.
SECTION 107.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 3 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5526), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from federal funds,  excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5526), collected or received by the Department of
Human Services, for central services and  state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is
increased by $146,290,416 for the ONE Integrated Eligibility and Medicaid Eligibility project.
SECTION 108.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017
(Enrolled House Bill 5026), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for programs, is increased
by $322,233 for the ONE Integrated Eligibility and Medicaid Eligibility project.
SECTION 109. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 4 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill
5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5026), collected  or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for
programs, is  increased by $1,306,605 for the ONE Integrated Eligibility and Medicaid Eligi-
bility project.
SECTION 110.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill
5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts,
recreational marijuana  tax receipts, provider taxes, Medicare receipts and federal funds for
indirect cost recovery, Supplemental Security Income recoveries, Women, Infants and Chil-
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 15
dren Program food rebates,  the Coordinated School Health Program, the Edward Byrne Me-
morial State and Local  Law Enforcement Assistance Grant Program and emergency
preparedness and response services, but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds not de-
scribed in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5026), collected  or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for shared  administrative costs, is increased by
$13,595,873 for the ONE Integrated Eligibility and Medicaid Eligibility project.
NOTE: Sections 111 and 112  were deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not re-
numbered.
SECTION 113. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made  to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5542), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2017, for the director’s
office is increased by $203,870  for the establishment of a limited-duration position supporting
the facilitation of place-based integrated  water resources strategies as described by section
2, chapter 780, Oregon Laws 2015.
SECTION 114. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5542),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses for administrative services  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscel-
laneous Receipts and including federal funds received under cooperative  agreements with or
contracts from the Bureau  of Reclamation of the United States Department of the Interior,
the United States Army Corps of Engineers, the Unites States Geological Survey,  the
Bonneville Power Administration and the National Fish and Wildlife  Foundation, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 3, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws
2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5542), collected or received by the Water  Resource Department, is
increased by $1,547,235 for the purpose of making grants and paying  the costs of direct ser-
vices provided under ORS 541.561, and for the payment  of bond issuance costs from the
Water Conservation, Reuse and Storage Investment Fund established by ORS 541.576.
SECTION 115. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 3 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5542), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses for administrative services from fees, moneys or other  revenues, including Miscel-
laneous Receipts and including  federal funds received under cooperative agreements with or
contracts from the Bureau of Reclamation of the United States Department  of the Interior,
the United  States Army Corps of Engineers, the Unites States Geological Survey, the
Bonneville Power Administration and  the National Fish and Wildlife Foundation, but ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds not described in section 3, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5542),  collected or received by the Water Resources Department,
is increased by the following amounts for paying  the following costs from the Water Supply
Development Account established by ORS 541.656:
(1) Water Supply Development
grants and loans as described in
ORS 541.656 (2)(a)...................... $ 15,000,000
(2) City of Carlton, Panther
Creek Reservoir Sedimentation and
Capacity Reduction project ....... $ 2,500,000
(3) City of Carlton, Water
Loss Reduction project ............. $ 2,000,000
(4) Santiam Water Control District,
Mill Creek Corporate Center
irrigation conversion project .... $ 1,200,000
(5) Bond issuance costs .................. $ 375,301
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 16
SECTION 116. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 1 (5), chapter 372, Oregon Laws 2017  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5512),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses for the Division of Financial Regulation from fees, moneys or other  revenues, in-
cluding Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or
received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, is increased by $154,056 for
the establishment of an operations and policy analyst position.
SECTION 117.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 1 (6), chapter 372, Oregon Laws 2017  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5512),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses for the Building Codes Division from fees, moneys or other revenues,  including
Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received
by the  Department of Consumer and Business Services, is increased by $1,748,149 for the
establishment of additional positions performing code development, technical and field ex-
amination and inspections and administrative support functions.
SECTION 118.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 1 (1), chapter 375, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5537), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of State
Lands, is increased by the following amounts, for the following purposes:
(1) Payment of costs associated
with custodial forest management
contract for Elliott State
Forest........................................ $ 1,608,930
(2) Fire protection patrol
Assessments for the Elliott
State Forest .............................. $ 608,000
(3) Development of Habitat Conservation
Plan and Environmental Impact
Study for Elliott State Forest .. $ 1,500,000
(4) Establishment of project manager
position for Portland Harbor
Superfund Site cleanup, Goble Site
cleanup and Elliott State Forest
projects ..................................... $ 268,447
SECTION 119.
In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of State Lands, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the amount  of $5,000,000, for deposit into the Portland Harbor Cleanup Fund
established by section 11, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5530).
SECTION 120. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$8,000,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of
State Lands, from  the Portland Harbor Cleanup Fund established by section 11, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5530).
SECTION 121. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 1 (1), chapter 375, Oregon Laws 2017  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5537),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of  State
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 17
Lands, is increased by $57,587 for the purpose of paying costs associated with the  issuance
of lottery bonds related to the Portland Harbor Cleanup Fund.
SECTION 122. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Forestry Department by section  1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5519), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, is increased  by $57,568
for debt service related to bonds issued for the Toledo Facility Replacement.
SECTION 123. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 2 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5519), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and includ-
ing federal funds from the United  States Forest Service for fire protection and for research
projects, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws  2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5519), collected or received by the State Forestry
Department, is increased by the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) Debt service for bonds
issued for Toledo Facility
Replacement.............................. $ 79,991
(2) Bond issuance costs for bonds
issued for Toledo Facility
Replacement.............................. $ 50,000
(3) Bond issuance costs for bonds
issued for Elliott State Forest
purchase.................................... $ 985,000
SECTION 124.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$100,000,000 is  established, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for
payment from the net proceeds from  the sale of certificates of participation under ORS
283.085 to  283.092, by the State Forestry Department, to finance the release of all or a portion
of the Elliott forest from restrictions resulting from ownership of that forest by the Common
School Fund, or to compensate the Common School Fund  for the preservation of noneco-
nomic benefits of the forest through the  imposition, transfer or sale of restrictions such as
easements, use requirements or restrictions,  or other methods that preserve noneconomic
benefits of the forest for the  public such as recreation, aesthetics, wildlife or habitat pres-
ervation or other environmental and quality of life considerations.
SECTION 125.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5519), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and includ-
ing federal funds from the United  States Forest Service for fire protection and for research
projects, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws  2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5519), collected or received by the State Forestry
Department, is increased by $300,000 for initial  activities related to the development of a
Habitat Conservation Plan for the Elliott State Forest.
SECTION 126. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill
5028), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the State Parks and Recreation Department,
is increased by $5,111,682 for the expenditure of lottery bond proceeds supporting  the Main
Street Revitalization Program and associated bond issuance costs.
SECTION 127.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$350,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from lottery funds allocated from the Veterans’ Services Fund estab-
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 18
lished under section 1, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 140),  to the
Housing and Community  Services Department for the purpose of providing emergency
housing assistance to veterans.
SECTION 128. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Housing and Community Services Department by section 1, chapter  ___,
Oregon Laws 2017  (Enrolled House Bill 5012), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, is in-
creased by $20,000,000 for the Emergency Housing Assistance and State Homeless Assistance
programs.
SECTION 129. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5526), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, for child welfare,
self-sufficiency and vocational rehabilitation services, is decreased by $3,413,214.
SECTION 130. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5526), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, for child welfare,
self-sufficiency and vocational rehabilitation services, is increased by $3,413,214 for the
Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program.
SECTION 131.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department  of Justice, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $500,000 for child abuse medical assessments.
SECTION 132. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Treasurer by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017  (Enrolled
Senate Bill 5541) for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2017, is increased by $1,056,224 for ad-
ministrative expenses of the Oregon Retirement Savings Board.
SECTION 133. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Military Department by  section 1 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5532), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017,  for emergency
management, is  increased by $181,178 for administration of the resiliency grant program de-
scribed in section 1, chapter __, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 2687).
SECTION 134. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5532), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment of
expenses from federal funds,  other than those described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5532), collected or received by the Oregon Military Depart-
ment, is increased by $181,178 for administration of the resiliency grant  program described
in section 1, chapter __, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 2687).
SECTION 135. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5532),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and re-
imbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds
not described in section 2, chapter __, Oregon Laws  2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5532), collected
or received by the Oregon Military Department, is increased by $5,070,000 for the cost of
bond issuance and for grants to be made from the Resiliency  Grant Fund established by
section 2, chapter __, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 2687).
SECTION 136.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Advocacy Commissions Office by section 1,  chapter 370, Oregon
Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5501), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, is increased
by $17,000.
SECTION 137. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 6 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5516), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for  payment of
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 19
grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased  services from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or
received by the Department of Education for programs other than those  specified in sections
3 and 10, chapter __, Oregon Laws  2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5516), is increased by
$170,000,000 for payments from the  High School Graduation and College and Career Readiness
Fund.
SECTION 138. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5033),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for professional
services, is increased by $1,800,000.
SECTION 139. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2017
(Enrolled House Bill 5026), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for programs, is increased
by $10,000 to ensure enrollment in coordinated care organizations of children placed in sub-
stitute care.
SECTION 140. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) Deschutes Rim Clinic
Foundation for the
Deschutes Rim Health
Clinic in Maupin........................ $ 1,000,000
(2) City of Mosier for a
multiuse facility ........................ $ 500,000
(3) Oregon Wine Board
for marketing ............................ $ 500,000
SECTION 141.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appro-
priation made to the Judicial Department by section 16, chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2017 (En-
rolled Senate Bill 505),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for the purchase of equipment
and services and for  other expenses necessary to carry out the provisions of chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 505), is increased by $600,000.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General  Fund appropriation made to
the Emergency  Board by section 17, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 505),
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, to be allocated  for expenses necessary to carry out
the provisions of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 505), is decreased by
$600,000.
SECTION 142.
(1) The allocation to the Department of State Police of moneys deposited
into the Watershed  Conservation Operating Fund by section 1, chapter ____, Oregon Laws
2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5040), for fish and  wildlife activities to implement Article XV, sec-
tion 4b, of the Oregon Constitution, is decreased by $250,765.
(2) The allocation to the State Department of Fish and Wildlife of moneys  deposited into
the Watershed Conservation Operating Fund  by section 2, chapter ____, Oregon Laws 2017
(Enrolled House Bill 5040), for activities and projects to  implement Article XV, section 4b,
of the Oregon Constitution, is decreased by $167,378.
(3) The allocation to the  State Department of Agriculture of moneys deposited into the
Watershed Conservation Operating Fund  by section 3, chapter _____, Oregon Laws 2017
(Enrolled House Bill 5040), for activities  and projects to implement Article XV, section 4b,
of the Oregon Constitution, is decreased by $231,617.
(4) The allocation  to the Department of Environmental Quality of moneys deposited into
the Watershed Conservation Operating Fund  by section 4, chapter ____, Oregon Laws 2017
(Enrolled House Bill 5040), for activities and projects to  implement Article XV, section 4b,
of the Oregon Constitution, is decreased by $77,348.
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 20
SECTION 143. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill
5017), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Legislative  Administration Committee
is increased by $239,358 for costs of issuance of general obligation bonds.
SECTION 144. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Legislative Administration Committee by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5017), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2017, is increased
by $906,053 for debt service.
SECTION 145. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the authorized appropriations
and expenditure limitations for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017,  for the following agen-
cies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
(1) ADMINISTRATION.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Advocacy Commissions
Office:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 370 -$6,529
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services
Debt Service:
General Fund HB 5002 1(5) -77,892
Chief Operating Office
Other funds HB 5002 2(1) -233,141
Chief Financial Office
Other funds HB 5002 2(2) -102,593
Office of the State Chief
Information Officer
Other funds HB 5002 2(3) -262,556
Chief Human Resource Office
Other funds HB 5002 2(4) -164,465
OSCIO - State Data Center
- Operations
Other funds HB 5002 2(5)(a)-1,151,456
OSCIO - State Data Center
- Equipment Replace
Other funds HB 5002 2(5)(c) -58,324
Enterprise Asset Management
Other funds HB 5002 2(6) +436,361
Enterprise Goods and
Services
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 21
Other funds HB 5002 2(7) -2,125,225
Enterprise Human Resource
Services
Other funds HB 5002 2(8) -21,194
Business Services
Other funds HB 5002 2(9) -768,859
Debt Service
- Article XI-O Bonds
Other funds HB 5002 2(11) +5
Debt Service - ODAS
Other funds HB 5002 2(13) +5
Debt Service and Related
Costs for Bonds Issued
Lottery funds HB 5002 3 -2,317,505
Oregon State Treasury:
Administrative Expenses
- ABLE
General Fund SB 5541 1(1) -24,719
Administrative Expenses
- ORSB
General Fund SB 5541 1(2) -18,008
Administrative Expenses
- Operations
Other funds SB 5541 2(1) -1,547,338
Administrative Expenses
- College Savings
Other funds SB 5541 2(2) -10,019
Oregon Racing Commission:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 58 1 -89,929
Public Employees
Retirement System:
Central Administration
Division
Other funds SB 5534 1(1) -201,996
Financial and Administrative
Services Division
Other funds SB 5534 1(2) -682,029
Information Services
Division
Other funds SB 5534 1(3) -621,521
Operations Division
Other funds SB 5534 1(4) -1,097,754
Compliance, Audit and
Risk Division
Other funds SB 5534 1(5) -114,759
Secretary of State:
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund SB 5536 1(1) -126,408
Other funds SB 5536 2(1) -326,154
Elections Division
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 22
General Fund SB 5536 1(2) -220,296
Other funds SB 5536 2(2) -39
Archives Division
Other funds SB 5536 2(4) -103,649
Audits Division
Other funds SB 5536 2(3) -449,357
Corporation Division
Other funds SB 5536 2(5) -151,548
Federal funds SB 5536 3 -472,720
Oregon Liquor Control
Commission:
Administrative Expenses
Other funds HB 5019 1(1) -1,315,406
Marijuana Regulation
Other funds HB 5019 1(2) -143,021
Department of Revenue:
Administration
General Fund SB 5535 1(1) -3,655,209
Other funds SB 5535 2(1) -187,588
Property Tax
General Fund SB 5535 1(2) -670,139
Other funds SB 5535 2(2) -19,802
Personal Tax and Compliance
General Fund SB 5535 1(3) -1,972,254
Other funds SB 5535 2(3) -47,494
Business
General Fund SB 5535 1(4) -621,206
Other funds SB 5535 2(4) -568,561
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5535 1(6) -7,666,981
Senior Property Tax Deferral
Other funds SB 5535 2(7) -36,919
Employment Relations Board:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 507 1 -29,574
Operating Expenses (fees)
Other funds Ch. 507 2 -4,442
Assessments of Agencies
Transferred to ODAS
Other funds Ch. 507 3 -12,055
Office of the Governor:
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5521 1 -525,236
Other funds SB 5521 4 -110,630
Regional Solutions
Lottery funds SB 5521 3 -138,447
Oregon Government
Ethics Commission:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 116 1 -28,614
State Library:
Operating Expenses
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 23
General Fund Ch. 510 1 -69,365
Operating Expenses
- Non-assessments
Other funds Ch. 510 2 -2,553
Operating Expenses
- Assessments
Other funds Ch. 510 3 -135,318
Operating Expenses
Federal funds Ch. 510 4 -1,625
(2) CONSUMER AND BUSINESS SERVICES.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Board of Accountancy:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 90 1 -$56,046
State Board of Tax
Practitioners:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 376 1 -18,835
Construction Contractors
Board:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 261 -461,875
Oregon Board of Licensed
Professional Counselors
and Therapists:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 262 1 -24,871
State Board of Psychologist
Examiners:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 262 2 -26,589
State Board of Chiropractic
Examiners:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 96 -51,085
State Board of Licensed
Social Workers:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 371 -25,841
Oregon Board Of Dentistry:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 97 -38,848
Health-Related
Licensing Boards:
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 24
State Mortuary and
Cemetery Board
Other funds Ch. 373 1 -21,099
Oregon Board of
Naturopathic Medicine
Other funds Ch. 373 2 -12,737
Occupational Therapy
Licensing Board
Other funds Ch. 373 3 -7,405
Board of Medical Imaging
Other funds Ch. 373 4 -14,003
State Board of Examiners
for Speech-Language
Pathology and Audiology
Other funds Ch. 373 5 -10,768
Oregon State Veterinary
Medical Examining Board
Other funds Ch. 373 6 -17,187
Bureau of Labor and
Industries:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 509 1 -541,696
Other funds Ch. 509 2 -195,369
Federal funds Ch. 509 4 -960
Wage Security Fund
Administration
Other funds Ch. 509 3(1) -83,367
Public Utility Commission:
Utility Program
Other funds Ch. 93 1(1) -625,870
Residential Service
Protection Fund
Other funds Ch. 93 1(2) -11,972
Administration
Other funds Ch. 93 1(3) -514,038
Oregon Board of Maritime
Pilots
Other funds Ch. 93 1(4) -4,996
Operating Expenses
Federal funds Ch. 93 2 -6,858
Department of Consumer
and Business Services:
Workers’ Compensation Board
Other funds Ch. 372 1(1) -686,446
Workers’ Compensation
Division
Other funds Ch. 372 1(2) -1,589,898
Oregon OSHA
Other funds Ch. 372 1(3) -968,443
Federal funds Ch. 372 4(1) -448,698
Central Services Division
Other funds Ch. 372 1(4) -999,676
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 25
Federal funds Ch. 372 4(3) -9,841
Division of Financial
Regulation
Other funds Ch. 372 1(5) -1,565,605
Building Codes Division
Other funds Ch. 372 1(6) -1,185,489
Federal funds Ch. 372 4(4) -3,851
Health Insurance Exchange
- Marketplace Division
Other funds Ch. 372 2(1) -158,934
Senior Health Insurance
Benefit Assistance
Federal funds Ch. 372 4(2) -12,870
Real Estate Agency:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 59 1 -276,826
Oregon State Board
of Nursing:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 126 1 -450,604
Oregon Medical Board:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 125 1 -345,981
State Board of Pharmacy:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 92 1 -261,147
(3) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Business
Development Department:
Oregon Arts Commission
General Fund HB 5025 1(1) -$14,561
Business, Innovation
and Trade
General Fund HB 5025 1(2) -6,974
Other funds HB 5025 2(1) -178,261
Lottery funds HB 5025 3(1) -484,677
Federal funds HB 5025 4(1)
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5025 1(3) -4,318,030
Infrastructure Finance
Authority
Other funds HB 5025 2(2) -142,756
Lottery funds HB 5025 3(5) -54,799
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 26
Federal funds HB 5025 4(2) -8,803
Operations
Other funds HB 5025 2(3) -63,577
Lottery funds HB 5025 3(2) -208,458
Federal funds HB 5025 4(3) -182
Arts and Cultural Trust
Other funds HB 5025 2(4) -27,334
Lottery Bond Debt Service
Lottery funds HB 5025 3(4) -1,410,613
Arts
Federal funds HB 5025 4(4) -4,247
Housing and Community
Services Department:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5012 1 -7,302
Other funds HB 5012 2 -668,446
Federal funds HB 5012 4 -119,605
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5012 5 -767,156
Department of Veterans’
Affairs:
Services Provided by the
Department and Operations
General Fund HB 5039 1(1) -136,724
Veteran Loans, Oregon
Veterans’ Homes
Other funds HB 5039 3(1) -450,617
Employment Department:
Operating Budget
Other funds Ch. 506 1(1) -2,842,329
Office of Administrative
Hearings
Other funds Ch. 506 1(2) -648,469
Operating Budget
Federal funds Ch. 506 4 -4,403,080
(4) EDUCATION.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Teacher Standards and
Practices Commission:
Operating Expenses
Other funds HB 5038 1 -$214,668
Department of Education:
Operations
General Fund SB 5516 1(1) -1,499,642
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 27
Other funds SB 5516 3(1) -619,049
Federal funds SB 5516 4(1) -951,295
Oregon School for the Deaf
General Fund SB 5516 1(2) -185,444
Federal funds SB 5516 4(2) -6,000
Debt service and
related costs
- XI-P bonds
General Fund SB 5516 8 -2,068,415
Chief Education Office
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5522 1 -369,306
Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
HECC Operations
General Fund SB 5524 1(1) -537,050
Debt Service and Related
Costs - XI-G Community
Colleges
General Fund SB 5524
1(16)(a) -5,339,250
Debt Service and Related
Costs - XI-G Bonds Public
Universities
General Fund SB 5524
1(16)(b) -4,883,437
Debt Service and Related
Costs - XI-G Bonds OHSU
General Fund SB 5533 1 -4,885,015
Debt Service and Related
Costs - XI-Q Public
Universities
General Fund SB 5524
1(16)(d) -3,618,101
Debt Service and Related
Costs - COPs Public
Universities
General Fund SB 5524
1(16)(e) +5
Lottery Debt Service
- from Administrative
Services Economic Development
Fund for Public Universities
Lottery funds SB 5524 2 -40,020
Lottery Debt Service
- from Administrative Services
Economic Development Fund for
Community Colleges
Lottery funds SB 5524 3 -33,955
Operations
Other funds SB 5524 6(1) -215,046
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 28
Federal funds SB 5524 7(1) -430,120
Oregon Youth
Conservation Corps
Other funds SB 5524 6(2) -1,701
Federal funds SB 5524 7(2) -173
(5) HUMAN SERVICES.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Long Term Care Ombudsman:
General Program and Services
Provided to Care Facility
Residents
General Fund HB 5021 1(1) -$199,839
Public Guardian and
Conservator Program
General Fund HB 5021 1(2) -72,670
Operating Expenses
Other funds HB 5021 2 -2,593
Commission for the Blind:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5003 1 -41,304
Other funds HB 5003 2 -11,467
Federal funds HB 5003 3 -157,969
Psychiatric Security Review
Board
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 411 1 -33,233
Department of Human Services:
Central Services and State
Assessments and Enterprise-Wide
Costs
General Fund SB 5526 1(1) -6,503,595
Other funds SB 5526 2(1) -114,553
Federal funds SB 5526 3(1) -5,645,170
Child Welfare, Self-
Sufficiency and Vocational
Rehabilitation Services
General Fund SB 5526 1(2) -2,248,160
Other funds SB 5526 2(2) -12,035
Federal funds SB 5526 3(2) -1,952,822
Aging and People with
Disabilities and
Intellectual/Developmental
Disabilities Programs
General Fund SB 5526 1(3) -3,003,415
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 29
Other funds SB 5526 2(3) -128,378
Federal funds SB 5526 3(3) -539,271
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5526 1(4) +1,028,094
Shared Services
Other funds SB 5526 2(4) -91,400
Oregon Health Authority:
Programs
General Fund HB 5026 1(1) -6,738,375
Other funds HB 5026 2(1) -2,780,297
Federal funds HB 5026 4(1) -5,804,750
Central Services, Statewide
Assessments and
Enterprise-Wide Costs
General Fund HB 5026 1(2) -3,949,892
Other funds HB 5026 2(2) -777,602
Federal funds HB 5026 4(2) -4,958,469
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5026 1(4) +4,001
Shared Administrative
Services
Other funds HB 5026 2(3) -2,484,473
Gambling Addiction Programs
Lottery funds HB 5026 3(1) -4,617
(6) JUDICIAL BRANCH.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Commission on Judicial
Fitness and Disability:
Administration
General Fund Ch. 91 1(1) -$577
Judicial Department:
Operations
General Fund HB 5013 1(2) -7,632,399
Other funds HB 5013 2(1) -463,210
Mandated Payments
General Fund HB 5013 1(3) -324,033
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5013 1(5) -2,555,411
Third-Party Debt Collection
General Fund HB 5013 1(6) -451,097
Oregon Law Commission
General Fund HB 5013 4 -12,186
Council on Court Procedures
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 30
General Fund HB 5013 5 -2,055
Conciliation and Mediation
Services in Circuit Courts
General Fund HB 5013 6(1) -274,864
Operating Law Libraries
or Providing Law Library
Services
General Fund HB 5013 7(1) -274,864
Public Defense Services
Commission:
Appellate Division
General Fund HB 5033 1(1) -114,978
Professional Services
General Fund HB 5033 1(2) -592,359
Contract and Business
Services Division
General Fund HB 5033 1(3) -31,964
(7) LEGISLATIVE BRANCH.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Legislative Administration
Committee:
General Program
General Fund HB 5017 1(1) -$1,035,828
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5017 1(2) -1,351,534
Other funds HB 5017 2(2) -28,305
Legislative Assembly:
Biennial General Fund
General Fund HB 5017 6 -887,914
79th Leg Assembly
General Fund HB 5017 7(1) -199,170
80th Leg Assembly
General Fund HB 5017 7(2) -237,310
Legislative Counsel
Committee:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5017 10 -232,754
Other funds HB 5017 11 -59,154
Legislative Fiscal
Officer:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5017 13(1) -183,583
Other funds HB 5017 13(2) -124,420
Legislative Revenue
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 31
Officer:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5017 15 -18,516
Commission on Indian
Services:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5017 16 -1,750
Legislative Policy
and Research Committee:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5017 14 -45,374
(8) NATURAL RESOURCES.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
State Marine Board:
Administration and
Education
Other funds Ch. 299 1(1) -$240,265
Federal funds Ch. 299 2(1) -638
Marine Law Enforcement
Other funds Ch. 299 1(2) -38,096
Facilities Construction
and Maintenance
Other funds Ch. 299 1(3) -48,898
Federal funds Ch. 299 2(3) -735
Aquatic Invasive Species
Other funds Ch. 299 1(4) -8,541
State Department Of Energy:
Operations
Other funds HB 5009 1 -538,561
Operations
Federal funds HB 5009 3 -72,012
State Department of
Geology and Mineral
Industries:
General Fund Ch. 508 1 -104,725
Geologic Survey
Other funds Ch. 508 2(1) -81,770
Mined Land Reclamation
Other funds Ch. 508 2(2) -59,652
Federal Funds
Federal funds Ch. 508 3 -65,496
State Parks and Recreation
Department:
Director’s Office
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 32
Other funds HB 5028 1(1) -9,909
Lottery funds HB 5028 2(1) -9,437
Central Services
Other funds HB 5028 1(2) -625,001
Lottery funds HB 5028 2(2) -595,228
Parks Development
Other funds HB 5028 1(3) -16,293
Lottery funds HB 5028 2(3) -77,833
Direct Services
Other funds HB 5028 1(4) -1,163,066
Lottery funds HB 5028 2(4) -1,084,203
Community Support and
Grants
Other funds HB 5028 1(5) -65,072
Lottery funds HB 5028 2(5) -114,304
Federal funds HB 5028 4(3) -7,925
Debt Service
Lottery funds HB 5028 3 -895,019
Land Use Board of Appeals:
General Fund Ch. 536 1 -11,384
Water Resources Department:
Administrative Services
General Fund SB 5542 1(1) -272,584
Other funds SB 5542 3(1) -8,346
Field Services
General Fund SB 5542 1(2) -419,025
Other funds SB 5542 3(2) -83,828
Technical Services
General Fund SB 5542 1(4) -292,796
Other funds SB 5542 3(4) -103,478
Water Rights and
Adjudications
General Fund SB 5542 1(3) -157,832
Other funds SB 5542 3(3) -149,596
Director’s Office
General Fund SB 5542 1(5) -144,123
Other funds SB 5542 3(5) -516
Debt Service
Lottery funds SB 5542 2 -2,078,875
Oregon Watershed Enhancement
Board:
Operating Expenses,
Activities and Projects
Lottery funds HB 5040 5 -205,451
Operations
Federal funds HB 5040 7(1) -1,136
Department of State Lands:
Common School Fund programs
Other funds Ch. 375 1(1) -889,306
Oregon Removal-Fill
Mitigation Fund
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 33
Other funds Ch. 375 1(2) -1,312
South Slough National
Estuarine Research Reserve
Operations
Other funds Ch. 375 1(3) -2,689
Federal funds Ch. 375 2(1) -3,183
State Department of
Agriculture:
Administrative and
Support Services
General Fund SB 5502 1(1) -35,090
Other funds SB 5502 2(1) -215,975
Food Safety
General Fund SB 5502 1(2) -320,643
Other funds SB 5502 2(2) -820,939
Federal funds SB 5502 4(2) -17,733
Natural Resources
General Fund SB 5502 1(3) -322,517
Other funds SB 5502 2(3) -498,819
Federal funds SB 5502 4(3) -290,342
Market Access
General Fund SB 5502 1(4) -138,405
Other funds SB 5502 2(4) -518,320
Federal funds SB 5502 4(4) -80,265
Parks and Natural
Resources Fund
Lottery funds SB 5502 3 -231,617
Department of Environmental
Quality:
Air Quality
General Fund SB 5518 1(1) -234,069
Other funds SB 5518 2(1) -888,549
Federal funds SB 5518 5(1) -122,687
Water Quality
General Fund SB 5518 1(2) -597,915
Other funds SB 5518 2(2) -598,902
Federal funds SB 5518 5(2) -200,452
Land Quality
General Fund SB 5518 1(3) -20,206
Other funds SB 5518 2(3) -989,962
Federal funds SB 5518 5(3) -138,104
Agency Management
Other funds SB 5518 2(4) -1,137,349
Parks and Natural
Resources Fund
Lottery funds SB 5518 3 -77,348
State Department of
Fish and Wildlife:
Fish Division
General Fund HB 5010 1(1) -709,209
Other funds HB 5010 2(1) -1,362,394
Lottery funds HB 5010 3(1) -138,259
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 34
Federal funds HB 5010 4(1) -2,277,221
Wildlife Division
General Fund HB 5010 1(2) -133,193
Other funds HB 5010 2(2) -665,554
Lottery funds HB 5010 3(2) -29,119
Federal funds HB 5010 4(2) -516,104
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund HB 5010 1(3) -294,396
Other funds HB 5010 2(3) -1,319,002
Federal funds HB 5010 4(3) -263,990
Capital Improvement
General Fund HB 5010 1(5) -5,556
Other funds HB 5010 2(4) -21,222
Federal funds HB 5010 4(4) -1,261
State Forestry Department:
Fire Protection
General Fund SB 5519 1(2) -807,445
Other funds SB 5519 2(2) -1,396,275
Federal funds SB 5519 4(2) -250,834
Private Forests
General Fund SB 5519 1(3) -393,658
Other funds SB 5519 2(4) -217,341
Federal funds SB 5519 4(4) -177,362
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5519 1(4) -468,487
Other funds SB 5519 2(6) +5
Agency Administration
Other funds SB 5519 2(1) -1,444,724
Federal funds SB 5519 4(1) -46,466
State Forests
Other funds SB 5519 2(3) -1,217,972
Federal funds SB 5519 4(3) -20,709
Equipment Pool
Other funds SB 5519 2(7) -172,599
Facilities Maintenance
and Management
Other funds SB 5519 2(8) -446
Debt Service Relating
to Purchase of Land
in Gilchrist Forest
Lottery funds SB 5519 3 -5,594
Department of Land
Conservation and Development:
Planning Program
General Fund SB 5527 1(1) -391,147
Other funds SB 5527 2 -1,373
Federal funds SB 5527 3 -108,803
Grant Programs
General Fund SB 5527 1(2) -4,782
Columbia River Gorge
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 35
Commission:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 474 1 +24,081
(9) PUBLIC SAFETY.
2017
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
State Board of Parole and
Post-Prison Supervision:
General Fund
General Fund HB 5029 1 -$340,944
Department of State Police:
Patrol Services, Criminal
Investigations and
Gaming Enforcement
General Fund HB 5031 1(1) -5,231,297
Other funds HB 5031 2(1) -1,056,019
Federal funds HB 5031 3(1) -23,202
Fish and Wildlife
Enforcement
General Fund HB 5031 1(2) -311,475
Other funds HB 5031 2(2) -541,852
Lottery funds HB 5031 4 -240,268
Federal funds HB 5031 3(2) -46,804
Forensic Services and
State Medical Examiner
General Fund HB 5031 1(3) -1,476,056
Other funds HB 5031 2(3) -15,792
Federal funds HB 5031 3(3) -31,043
Administrative Services,
Agency Support, Criminal
Justice Information Services
and Office of State Fire
Marshal
General Fund HB 5031 1(4) -1,878,554
Other funds HB 5031 2(4) -934,590
Federal funds HB 5031 3(4) -41,477
Department of Corrections:
Operations and Health
Services
General Fund HB 5004 1(1) -15,399,207
Other funds HB 5004 2(1) -157,078
Central Administration and
Administrative Services
General Fund HB 5004 1(2) -6,140,616
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 36
Other funds HB 5004 2(2) -277,134
Offender Management and
Rehabilitation
General Fund HB 5004 1(3) -2,685,607
Other funds HB 5004 2(3) -195
Community Corrections
General Fund HB 5004 1(4) -246,254
Other funds HB 5004 2(4) -14,429
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5004 1(5) -658,193
Agency Operations
Federal funds HB 5004 3 -10,323
Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission:
General Fund
General Fund Ch. 505 1 -87,794
Other Funds
Other funds Ch. 505 2 -1,137
Federal Funds
Federal funds Ch. 505 3 -3,503
District Attorneys and
Deputies:
Department of Justice for
District Attorneys
General Fund Ch. 535 1 -23,359
Department of Justice:
Civil Enforcement Division
General Fund HB 5015 1(2) -175,560
Other funds HB 5015 2(3) -2,730,192
Federal funds HB 5015 3(1) -110,833
Criminal Justice Division
General Fund HB 5015 1(3) -742,746
Other funds HB 5015 2(4) -400,113
Federal funds HB 5015 3(2) -7,605
Crime Victims’ Services
Division
General Fund HB 5015 1(4) -62,074
Other funds HB 5015 2(5) -143,012
Federal funds HB 5015 3(3) -45,546
Defense of Criminal
Convictions
General Fund HB 5015 1(5) -2,311,204
Division of Child Support
General Fund HB 5015 1(6) -769,725
Other funds HB 5015 2(8) -792,734
Federal funds HB 5015 3(4) -2,907,865
Debt Service and Related
Costs
General Fund HB 5015 1(7) -156,291
Office of Attorney General
and Administration
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 37
Other funds HB 5015 2(1) -1,019,176
Appellate Division
Other funds HB 5015 2(2) -596,415
General Counsel Division
Other funds HB 5015 2(6) -1,533,642
Trial Division
Other funds HB 5015 2(7) -889,956
Oregon Military Department:
Administration
General Fund SB 5532 1(1) +76,996
Other funds SB 5532 2(1) -45,478
Operations
General Fund SB 5532 1(2) -411,130
Other funds SB 5532 2(2) -71,972
Federal funds SB 5532 3(1) -1,306,853
Emergency Management
General Fund SB 5532 1(3) +93,379
Other funds SB 5532 2(3) -136,055
Federal funds SB 5532 3(2) -74,983
Community Support
General Fund SB 5532 1(4) -8,090
Other funds SB 5532 2(4) -19,572
Federal funds SB 5532 3(3) +44,277
Capital Debt Service
and Related Costs
General Fund SB 5532 1(5) -424,421
Debt Service
Other funds SB 5532 2(5) +5
Capital Improvement
Federal funds SB 5532 3(4) -11
Department of Public Safety
Standards and Training:
Operations
Other funds HB 5034 2(1) -1,183,157
Federal funds HB 5034 3 -5,100
Oregon Youth Authority:
Operations
General Fund HB 5042 1(1) -5,665,031
Other funds HB 5042 2 -108,106
Federal funds HB 5042 3 -218,984
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5042 1(5) +230,551
Capital Improvements
General Fund HB 5042 1(6) -8,030
(10) TRANSPORTATION.
2017
Oregon Laws
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 38
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Department of Aviation:
Operations
Other funds Ch. 95 1(1) -$28,552
Federal funds Ch. 95 2(1) -1,538
Aircraft Registration
Other funds Ch. 95 1(2) -4,154
Pavement Maintenance
Other funds Ch. 95 1(3) -6,758
General Aviation Entitlement
Grant Program
Other funds Ch. 95 1(4) -509
Department of
Transportation:
RD Passenger Rail
General Fund SB 5540 2 -389,942
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5540 3 -1,037,553
Other funds SB 5540 4(16) +10
Lottery funds SB 5540 6 -6,039,258
Capital Improvement
Other funds SB 5540 4(1)
Maintenance and Emergency
Relief Programs
Other funds SB 5540 4(2) -6,836,939
Preservation Program
Other funds SB 5540 4(3) -802,259
Bridge Program
Other funds SB 5540 4(4) -847,797
Operations Program
Other funds SB 5540 4(5) -1,197,378
Modernization Program
Other funds SB 5540 4(6) -1,247,576
Special Programs
Other funds SB 5540 4(7) -4,404,898
Local Government Program
Other funds SB 5540 4(8) -426,811
Driver and Motor Vehicle
Services
Other funds SB 5540 4(9) -3,451,697
Motor Carrier
Transportation
Other funds SB 5540 4(10) -1,474,879
Transportation Program
Development
Other funds SB 5540 4(11) -2,190,811
Federal funds SB 5540 5(2) -7,622
Public Transit
Other funds SB 5540 4(12) -150,456
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 39
Federal funds SB 5540 5(3) -4,693
Rail
Other funds SB 5540 4(13) -22,366
Federal funds SB 5540 5(4) -101,026
Transportation Safety
Other funds SB 5540 4(14) -126,057
Federal funds SB 5540 5(5) -112,373
Central Services
Other funds SB 5540 4(15) -15,432,922
Federal funds SB 5540 5(6) -1,316
SECTION 146. This 2017 Act being necessary for  the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by House July 5, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 40